Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.400

Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship.

The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives may administer and conduct the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship to provide resources for Washington students who participate in the legislative internship program of the senate and house of representatives. The scholarship program should provide assistance to students, based on financial need, who are accepted as legislative interns. The program is called the Rosa Franklin legislative internship program scholarship.

[ 2021 c 108 s 1.]